North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 2. Amendment of Bylaws.

§ 55-10-20.
Amendment by board of directors or shareholders.

A corporation’s board of directors may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws, except to the extent otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or a bylaw adopted by the shareholders or this Chapter, and except that a bylaw adopted, amended or repealed by the shareholders may not be readopted, amended or repealed by the board of directors if neither the articles of incorporation nor a bylaw adopted by the shareholders authorizes the board of directors to adopt, amend or repeal that particular bylaw or the bylaws generally. The limitations set forth in this subsection on the ability of a corporation’s board of directors to amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws shall not apply to any amendment to the extent that it is effected pursuant to G.S. 55-7-31(f).

A corporation’s shareholders may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws even though the bylaws may also be amended or repealed by its board of directors.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, ss. 2, 3; 1973, c. 469, s. 4; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2018-45, s. 15.

§ 55-10-21.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

North Carolina Commentary

This section of the Model Act was omitted because the subject is covered in

G.S. 55-7-27

.

§ 55-10-22.
Bylaw increasing quorum or voting requirement for directors or prohibiting a meeting of shareholders solely by remote participation.

A bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors or that prohibits a meeting of shareholders solely by means of remote communication may be amended or repealed as follows:

If originally adopted by the shareholders, only by the shareholders, unless amendment or repeal by the board of directors is permitted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

If originally adopted by the board of directors, either by the shareholders or by the board of directors.

A bylaw adopted or amended by the shareholders that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it may be amended or repealed only by a specified vote of either the shareholders or the board of directors.

The following applies to a bylaw referred to in subsection (a) of this section.

It shall not be adopted by the board of directors by a vote less than a majority of the directors then in office.

It shall not itself be amended by a quorum or vote of the directors less than the quorum or vote therein prescribed or prescribed by the shareholders pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, ss. 2, 3; 1973, c. 469, s. 4; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 1(f).